Hawaii statutes.
[§98-10] Uniformity of application and
construction. In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration
shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its
subject matter among states that enact it. [L 2013, c 11, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next